incubator/apertium-pl-cs.cs.dix
    <pardef n="entuziazm/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ů</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ům</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ech</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ile/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ů</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ům</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ech</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ďáb/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lové</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lů</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lu</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lovi</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lům</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ly</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lové</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lovi</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lech</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lem</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ly</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="led/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nům</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nech</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nem</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="héterismus"><i>héterism</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="synkretizmus"><i>synkretizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="limbus"><i>limb</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komunismus"><i>komunism</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enthusiasmus"><i>enthusiasm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fašismus"><i>fašism</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ďábel"><i>ďáb</i><par n="ďáb/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hinduizmus"><i>hinduizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neologismus"><i>neologism</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fašizmus"><i>fašizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sarkazmus"><i>sarkazm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leden"><i>led</i><par n="led/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rasismus"><i>rasism</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rasizmus"><i>rasizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="héterizmus"><i>héterizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sarkasmus"><i>sarkasm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="entuziasmus"><i>entuziasm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konsensus"><i>konsens</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mikroorganizmus"><i>mikroorganizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fanatizmus"><i>fanatizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="entuziazmus"><i>entuziazm</i><par n="entuziazm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ileus"><i>ile</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neologizmus"><i>neologizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mikroorganismus"><i>mikroorganism</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konsenzus"><i>konsenz</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fanatismus"><i>fanatism</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komunizmus"><i>komunizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="historizmus"><i>historizm</i><par n="ile/us__n"/></e>
